vi: Khung thêu tương thích với loại giá đỡ: Chân đế kẹp; Chân đế sàn; Khung thêu để đùi; Không lắp được trên giá đỡ; Giá đỡ để bàn; Mọi giá đỡ/Đa năng; Khác
fi: Kirjontakankaan kehykseen sopiva jalustatyyppi: Pöytään puristettava teline; Lattiateline; Syliteline; Ei asennettavissa telineeseen; Pöytäteline; Yleiskäyttöinen / mikä tahansa teline; Muu
el: Βάση συμβατή με πλαίσιο για κεντήματα: Βάση με σφιγκτήρα; Επιδαπέδια βάση; Βάση αγκαλιάς; Μη τοποθετούμενο σε βάση; Επιτραπέζια/βάση γραφείου; Γενικής χρήσης/οποιαδήποτε βάση; Άλλο
cs: Typ stojanu kompatibilního s rámem pro needlepoint: Stojan se svorkou; Podlahový stojan; Stojan na klín; Nelze upevnit na stojan; Stolní stojan; Univerzální / jakýkoli stojan; Ostatní
zh-TW: 針繡框相容支架類型: 夾式支架; 落地支架; 膝上支架; 不可安裝支架; 桌上支架; 通用/任何支架; 其他
nl: Stramienraam compatibel standaardtype: Opklembare standaard; Vloerstandaard; Schootstandaard; Niet op standaard te monteren; Tafel-/bureaustandaard; Universeel/elke standaard; Anders
zh-CN: 绣架适配支架类型: 夹钳式支架; 落地支架; 腿上支架; 不可安装支架; 桌上/办公桌支架; 通用/任何支架; 其他
de: Kompatibler Ständertyp für den Needlepoint-Rahmen: Anklemmständer; Bodenständer; Schoßständer; Nicht auf Ständer montierbar; Tisch-/Schreibtischständer; Universal/jeder Ständer; Sonstiges
ko: 니들포인트 프레임 호환 스탠드 유형: 클램프온 스탠드; 플로어 스탠드; 랩 스탠드; 스탠드 장착 불가; 테이블/데스크 스탠드; 유니버설/모든 스탠드; 기타
th: ขาตั้งที่เข้ากันได้กับกรอบงานปักครอสติช: ขาตั้งแบบหนีบ; ขาตั้งพื้น; ขาตั้งแบบวางตัก; ติดตั้งกับขาตั้งไม่ได้; ขาตั้งโต๊ะ; ขาตั้งอเนกประสงค์/แบบใดก็ได้; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tipul de suport compatibil cu cadrul de goblen pentru brodat: Suport cu prindere prin clemă; Suport de podea; Suport pentru poală; Nu se poate monta pe suport; Suport pentru masă/birou; Universal/orice suport; Altele
nb: Kompatibel stativtype for nålepunktramme: Stativ med klemme; Gulvstativ; Fangstativ; Kan ikke monteres på stativ; Bord-/skrivebordsstativ; Universelt / alle stativer; Annet
hu: Gobelin-/tűfestő kerettel kompatibilis állványtípus: Asztalra rögzíthető állvány; Padlóállvány; Ölbe vehető állvány; Nem szerelhető állványra; Asztali állvány; Univerzális/bármilyen állvány; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta stalka kompatibilna s okvirom za goblen: Stalak sa stezaljkom; Podni stalak; Stalak za krilo; Ne može se montirati na stalak; Stalak za stol / radni stol; Univerzalni / bilo koji stalak; Ostalo
es: Tipo de soporte compatible con el bastidor de bordado: Soporte con abrazadera; Soporte de suelo; Soporte de regazo; No montable en soporte; Soporte de mesa/escritorio; Universal/cualquier soporte; Otro
pt-BR: Bastidor para tapeçaria tipo de suporte compatível: Suporte com grampo; Suporte de chão; Suporte de colo; Não montável em suporte; Suporte de mesa/escrivaninha; Universal/qualquer suporte; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta stojala, združljivega z okvirjem za gobelin: Stojalo s sponko; Talno stojalo; Stojalo za v naročje; Ni mogoče pritrditi na stojalo; Namizno stojalo; Univerzalno/katero koli stojalo; Drugo
pt-PT: Suporte compatível com moldura de bordado: Suporte de fixação por grampo; Suporte de chão; Suporte de colo; Não montável em suporte; Suporte de mesa/secretária; Universal/qualquer suporte; Outro
sk-SK: Stojan kompatibilný s rámom na vyšívanie: Upínací stojan; Podlahový stojan; Stojan na kolená; Bez možnosti montáže na stojan; Stolný stojan; Univerzálny/akýkoľvek stojan; Iné
ru: Совместимый тип стойки для рамы гобеленовой вышивки: Подставка с зажимом; Напольная подставка; Подставка на колени; Без возможности установки на подставку; Настольная подставка; Универсальная/любая подставка; Другая
pl: Kompatybilny typ stojaka ramy needlepoint: Stojak z zaciskiem; Stojak podłogowy; Stojak na kolana; Brak możliwości montażu na stojaku; Stojak stołowy/biurkowy; Uniwersalny/dowolny stojak; Inne
ja: ニードルポイントFrame対応スタンドタイプ: クランプオンスタンド; フロアスタンド; ラップスタンド; スタンド取り付け不可; テーブル/デスクスタンド; ユニバーサル/あらゆるスタンド; その他
bg-BG: Съвместим тип стойка за рамка за гоблен: Стойка със стяга; Стойка за под; Стойка за скут; Не се монтира на стойка; Стойка за маса/бюро; Универсална/всякаква стойка; Друго
it: Tipo di supporto compatibile con il telaio per mezzo punto: Supporto a morsetto; Supporto da terra; Supporto da grembo; Non montabile su supporto; Supporto da tavolo/scrivania; Universale/qualsiasi supporto; Altro
tr: Goblen çerçevesi uyumlu stand tipi: Kelepçeli stand; Zemin standı; Diz standı; Standa monte edilemez; Masaüstü stand; Evrensel/herhangi bir stand; Diğer
lt-LT: Gobeleno rėmo suderinamo stovo tipas: Prisukamas stovas; Ant grindų statomas stovas; Ant kelių dedamas stovas; Netvirtinamas prie stovo; Stalo stovas; Universalus / bet koks stovas; Kita
da: Kompatibel stativtype for stramajramme: Stativ med klemme; Gulvstativ; Skødstativ; Kan ikke monteres på stativ; Bord-/skrivebordsstativ; Universal / ethvert stativ; Andet
fr: Type de support compatible avec le cadre à tapisserie: Support à pince; Support de sol; Support pour genoux; Non montable sur support; Support de table/bureau; Universel/tout support; Autre
sv: Stativtyp kompatibel med nålstickningsram: Klämstativ; Golvstativ; Knästativ; Kan inte monteras på stativ; Bordsstativ; Universal/alla stativ; Övrigt
en: Needlepoint frame compatible stand type: Clamp-on stand; Floor stand; Lap stand; Not stand-mountable; Table/desk stand; Universal/any stand; Other